Utah statutes.
9-4-303.   Impact fund -- Deposits and contents -- Use of fund monies.
(1)  There is created an enterprise fund entitled the "Permanent Community
Impact Fund."
(2)  The fund consists of:
(a)  all amounts appropriated to the impact fund under Section 59-21-2;
(b)  bonus payments deposited to the impact fund pursuant to Subsection
59-21-1(2);
(c) all amounts appropriated to the impact fund under Section 53C-3-203;
(d)  all amounts received for the repayment of loans made by the impact board
under this chapter; and
(e)  all other monies appropriated or otherwise made available to the impact
fund by the Legislature.
(3)  The state treasurer shall:
(a)  invest the monies in the impact fund by following the procedures and
requirements of Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act; and
(b)  deposit all interest or other earnings derived from those investments
into the impact fund.
(4)  The amounts in the impact fund available for loans, grants,
administrative costs, or other purposes of this part shall be limited to that
which the Legislature appropriates for these purposes.
(5)  Federal mineral lease revenue received by the state under the Leasing Act
that is deposited into the impact fund shall be used:
(a)  in a manner consistent with:
(i)  the Leasing Act; and
(ii)  this part; and
(b)  for loans, grants, or both to state agencies or subdivisions that are
socially or economically impacted by the leasing of minerals under the Leasing
Act.
(6)  The monies described in Subsection (2)(c) shall be used for grants to
political subdivisions of the state to mitigate the impacts resulting from the
development or use of school and institutional trust lands.
